Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,244
Private onsite wastewater treatment system, defined.

Private onsite wastewater treatment system means any system of piping, treatment devices, or other appurtenances that convey, store, treat, or dispose of domestic or nondomestic wastewater, but not including wastewater from a livestock waste control facility, on the property where it originates or on nearby property under the control of the user, which system is not connected to a public sewer system.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 9.